Hawaii statutes.
§457-8.5 Advanced practice registered
nurse; qualifications; licensure; endorsement; fees; eligibility. (a) The
board shall grant an advanced practice registered nurse license to a nurse who
has:

(1) A current, unencumbered license as a registered
nurse in this State;

(2) An unencumbered license as a registered nurse in
all other states in which the nurse has a current and active license;

(3) An unencumbered license as an advanced practice
registered nurse or similar designation in all other states in which the nurse
has a current and active license as an advanced practice registered nurse;

(4) Completed an accredited graduate-level education
program preparing the nurse for one of the four recognized advanced practice
registered nurse roles;

(5) A current, unencumbered certification of having
passed a national certification examination that measures role and
population-focused competencies and is recognized by the board;

(6) Maintained continued competencies through
recertification in role and population-focused competencies through a national
certification program recognized by the board;

(7) Acquired advanced clinical knowledge and skills
preparing the nurse to provide direct care to patients through a significant
educational and practical concentration on the direct care of patients;

(8) Demonstrated a greater breadth of knowledge, a
greater synthesis of data, greater complexity of skills and interventions, and
greater role autonomy than demonstrated by a registered nurse;

(9) Been educationally prepared to assume
responsibility and accountability for health promotion and maintenance and to
assess, diagnose, and manage patient problems through the use and prescription
of pharmacologic and non-pharmacologic interventions;

(10) Acquired clinical experience of sufficient depth
and breadth to reflect the intended license;

(11) Beginning with the July 1, 2017, licensing
biennium, submitted a full set of electronic fingerprints for the purpose of
obtaining federal and state criminal history record checks in accordance with
section 846-2.7 directly to the Hawaii criminal justice data center for
processing with the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The applicant shall bear
the cost of the fingerprint processing and the application shall not be
considered complete until the results of the criminal history record check have
been received by the board; and

(12) Paid the appropriate fees.

(b) Any person licensed as an advanced
practice registered nurse prior to October 1, 2009, whose license was granted
based on a master's degree in nursing or a current certification for
specialized and advanced nursing practice from a national certifying body
recognized by the board shall be eligible to renew that license; provided that
all nurse licenses and prescriptive authorities or similar designations held by
the person in any jurisdiction are unencumbered.

(c) Any person applying for advanced practice
registered nurse licensure by endorsement shall be licensed as an advanced
practice registered nurse; provided that:

(1) The person applying is licensed as a registered
nurse in this State; and

(2) All nurse licenses and prescriptive authorities
or similar designations held by the person under the laws of this State,
another state, or a United States territory are unencumbered, and the
originating state's requirements were equal to or greater than the board's
advanced practice registered nurse requirements which were in effect prior to
October 1, 2009.

An advanced practice registered nurse shall be
eligible to renew the license granted under this subsection; provided that all
nurse licenses and prescriptive authorities or similar designations held by the
person in this State, another state, or a United States territory are
unencumbered.

(d) Only a person who has a current,
unencumbered license from the board to practice as an advanced practice
registered nurse shall use the title "Advanced Practice Registered
Nurse" and the abbreviation "A.P.R.N.". No other person shall
assume the title "nurse" or in any manner imply
that the person is a nurse except as defined in section 457-2 or as provided in
sections 457-7 and 457-8 or use the abbreviation "A.P.R.N." or any
other words, letter, sign, or device to indicate that the person using the same
is an advanced practice registered nurse. Nothing in this section shall
preclude a registered nurse who is not licensed by the board as an advanced
practice registered nurse and who is currently certified by a national
certifying body recognized by the board from using another title designated by
certification. [L 1994, c 277, §1; am L 1995, c 88, §4; am L 1996, c 150, §4;
am L 1998, c 279, §2; am L 2000, c 8, §1; am L 2004, c 88, §4; am L 2009, c
169, §9; am L 2013, c 19, §2; am L 2014, c 46, §7; am L 2016, c 97, §5]

Case Notes

To the extent plaintiffs alleged that the nurse practitioners
were not "licensed", the court rejected the claim; because an
advanced practice registered nurse title is a "recognition" granted
by the board--not a license--the nurse practitioners with registered nurse
licenses were "licensed" under Hawaii law. 560 F. Supp. 2d 988
(2008).

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next